test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-allnouns_gt-norm.yaml
  
  Noun - tohtôsâpoy - ok : # -m inanimate noun, milk, with poss. element
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Sg: tohtôsâpoy
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Pl: tohtôsâpoya
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Loc: tohtôsâpôhk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg: cohcôsâpôsis
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl: cohcôsâpôsisak
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Loc: cohcôsâpôsisihk
     
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitôhtôsâpôm
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitôhtôsâpôm
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: otôhtôsâpôm
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Sg+Px4Sg: otôhtôsâpômiyiw
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitôhtôsâpôminân
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitôhtôsâpôminaw
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitôhtôsâpômiwâw
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: otôhtôsâpômiwâw
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Sg+Px4Pl: otôhtôsâpômiyiw
     
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitôhtôsâpôma
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitôhtôsâpôma
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: otôhtôsâpôma
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Pl+Px4Sg: otôhtôsâpômiyiwa
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitôhtôsâpôminâna
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitôhtôsâpôminawa
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitôhtôsâpômiwâwa
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: otôhtôsâpômiwâwa
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Pl+Px4Pl: otôhtôsâpômiyiwa
     
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: nicohcôsâpômis
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kicohcôsâpômis
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: ocohcôsâpômis
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px4Sg: ocohcôsâpômisiyiw
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: nicohcôsâpômisinân
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kicohcôsâpômisinaw
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kicohcôsâpômisiwâw
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: ocohcôsâpômisiwâw
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px4Pl: ocohcôsâpômisiyiw
     
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: nicohcôsâpômisa
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kicohcôsâpômisa
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: ocohcôsâpômisa
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px4Sg: ocohcôsâpômisiyiwa
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: nicohcôsâpômisinâna
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kicohcôsâpômisinawa
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kicohcôsâpômisiwâwa
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: ocohcôsâpômisiwâwa
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px4Pl: ocohcôsâpômisiyiwa
     
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitôhtôsâpômihk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitôhtôsâpômihk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: otôhtôsâpômihk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Px4Sg+Loc: otôhtôsâpômiyihk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitôhtôsâpôminâhk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitôhtôsâpôminâhk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitôhtôsâpômiwâhk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: otôhtôsâpômiwâhk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Px4Pl+Loc: otôhtôsâpômiyihk

     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: nicohcôsâpômisihk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: kicohcôsâpômisihk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: ocohcôsâpômisihk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px4Sg+Loc: ocohcôsâpômisiyihk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: nicohcôsâpômisinâhk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: kicohcôsâpômisinâhk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: kicohcôsâpômisiwâhk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: ocohcôsâpômisiwâhk
     tohtôsâpoy+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px4Pl+Loc: ocohcôsâpômisiyihk

  
  Noun - wâhkw - ok : # -m animate noun, roe
     wâhkw+N+AN+Sg: wâhkw
     wâhkw+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: niwâhkom
     wâhkw+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kiwâhkom
     wâhkw+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: owâhkoma
     wâhkw+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: owâhkomiyiwa
     wâhkw+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: niwâhkominân
     wâhkw+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kiwâhkominaw
     wâhkw+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kiwâhkomiwâw
     wâhkw+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: owâhkomiwâwa
     wâhkw+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: owâhkomiyiwa

     wâhkw+N+AN+Pl: wâhkwak
     wâhkw+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: niwâhkomak
     wâhkw+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kiwâhkomak
     wâhkw+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: owâhkoma
     wâhkw+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: owâhkomiyiwa
     wâhkw+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: niwâhkominânak
     wâhkw+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kiwâhkominawak
     wâhkw+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kiwâhkomiwâwak
     wâhkw+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: owâhkomiwâwa
     wâhkw+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: owâhkomiyiwa

     wâhkw+N+AN+Obv: wâhkwa
     wâhkw+N+AN+Loc: wâhkohk
     wâhkw+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: niwâhkomihk
     wâhkw+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kiwâhkomihk
     wâhkw+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: owâhkomihk
     wâhkw+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: owâhkomiyihk
     wâhkw+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: niwâhkominâhk
     wâhkw+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kiwâhkominâhk
     wâhkw+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kiwâhkomiwâhk
     wâhkw+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: owâhkomiwâhk
     wâhkw+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: owâhkomiyihk

     wâhkw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: wâhkos
     wâhkw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: wâhkosak

  
  Noun - wâposw - ok : # -m animate noun, rabbit paradim Okim. p 135 
     
     wâposw+N+AN+Sg: wâposw
     wâposw+N+AN+Pl: wâposwak # not in Okimasis
     wâposw+N+AN+Loc: wâposihk # not in Okimasis
     
     wâposw+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: niwâposom
     wâposw+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kiwâposom
     wâposw+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: owâposoma
     wâposw+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: owâposomiyiwa
     wâposw+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: niwâposominân
     wâposw+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kiwâposominaw
     wâposw+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kiwâposomiwâw
     wâposw+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: owâposomiwâwa
     wâposw+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: owâposomiyiwa

     wâposw+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: niwâposomak
     wâposw+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kiwâposomak
     wâposw+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: owâposoma
     wâposw+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: owâposomiyiwa
     wâposw+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: niwâposominânak
     wâposw+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kiwâposominawak
     wâposw+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kiwâposomiwâwak
     wâposw+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: owâposomiwâwa
     wâposw+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: owâposomiyiwa

  
  Noun - wâwi - ok : # -m inanimate noun with poss element, egg
     wâwi+N+IN+Sg: wâwi
     wâwi+N+IN+Pl: wâwa
     wâwi+N+IN+Loc: wâwihk
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg: wâwis
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl: wâwisak
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Loc: wâwisihk
     
     wâwi+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: niwâwim
     wâwi+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kiwâwim
     wâwi+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: owâwim
     wâwi+N+IN+Sg+Px4Sg: owâwimiyiw
     wâwi+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: niwâwiminân
     wâwi+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kiwâwiminaw
     wâwi+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kiwâwimiwâw
     wâwi+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: owâwimiwâw
     wâwi+N+IN+Sg+Px4Pl: owâwimiyiw
     
     wâwi+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: niwâwima
     wâwi+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kiwâwima
     wâwi+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: owâwima
     wâwi+N+IN+Pl+Px4Sg: owâwimiyiwa
     wâwi+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: niwâwiminâna
     wâwi+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kiwâwiminawa
     wâwi+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kiwâwimiwâwa
     wâwi+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: owâwimiwâwa
     wâwi+N+IN+Pl+Px4Pl: owâwimiyiwa
     
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: niwâwimis
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kiwâwimis
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: owâwimis
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px4Sg: owâwimisiyiw
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: niwâwimisinân
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kiwâwimisinaw
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kiwâwimisiwâw
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: owâwimisiwâw
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px4Pl: owâwimisiyiw
     
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: niwâwimisa
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kiwâwimisa
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: owâwimisa
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px4Sg: owâwimisiyiwa
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: niwâwimisinâna
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kiwâwimisinawa
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kiwâwimisiwâwa
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: owâwimisiwâwa
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px4Pl: owâwimisiyiwa
     
     wâwi+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: niwâwimihk
     wâwi+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: kiwâwimihk
     wâwi+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: owâwimihk
     wâwi+N+IN+Px4Sg+Loc: owâwimiyihk
     wâwi+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: niwâwiminâhk
     wâwi+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: kiwâwiminâhk
     wâwi+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: kiwâwimiwâhk
     wâwi+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: owâwimiwâhk
     wâwi+N+IN+Px4Pl+Loc: owâwimiyihk

     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: niwâwimisihk
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: kiwâwimisihk
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: owâwimisihk
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px4Sg+Loc: owâwimisiyihk
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: niwâwimisinâhk
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: kiwâwimisinâhk
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: kiwâwimisiwâhk
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: owâwimisiwâhk
     wâwi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px4Pl+Loc: owâwimisiyihk

  
  Noun - wayasit - ok : # -m animate noun, hoof
     wayasit+N+IN+Sg: wayasit
     wayasit+N+IN+Pl: wayasita
     wayasit+N+IN+Loc: wayasitihk
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg: wayasicis
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl: wayasicisa
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Loc: wayasicisihk

     wayasit+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: niwayasit
     wayasit+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kiwayasit
     wayasit+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: owayasit
     wayasit+N+IN+Sg+Px4Sg: owayasitiyiw
     wayasit+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: niwayasitinân
     wayasit+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kiwayasitinaw
     wayasit+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kiwayasitiwâw
     wayasit+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: owayasitiwâw
     wayasit+N+IN+Sg+Px4Pl: owayasitiyiw

     wayasit+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: niwayasita
     wayasit+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kiwayasita
     wayasit+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: owayasita
     wayasit+N+IN+Pl+Px4Sg: owayasitiyiwa
     wayasit+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: niwayasitinâna
     wayasit+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kiwayasitinawa
     wayasit+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kiwayasitiwâwa
     wayasit+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: owayasitiwâwa
     wayasit+N+IN+Pl+Px4Pl: owayasitiyiwa

     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: niwayasicis
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kiwayasicis
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: owayasicis
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px4Sg: owayasicisiyiw
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: niwayasicisinân
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kiwayasicisinaw
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kiwayasicisiwâw
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: owayasicisiwâw
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px4Pl: owayasicisiyiw

     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: niwayasicisa
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kiwayasicisa
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: owayasicisa
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px4Sg: owayasicisiyiwa
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: niwayasicisinâna
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kiwayasicisinawa
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kiwayasicisiwâwa
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: owayasicisiwâwa
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px4Pl: owayasicisiyiwa

     wayasit+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: niwayasitihk
     wayasit+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: kiwayasitihk
     wayasit+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: owayasitihk
     wayasit+N+IN+Px4Sg+Loc: owayasitiyihk
     wayasit+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: niwayasitinâhk
     wayasit+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: kiwayasitinâhk
     wayasit+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: kiwayasitiwâhk
     wayasit+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: owayasitiwâhk 
     wayasit+N+IN+Px4Pl+Loc: owayasitiyihk

     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: niwayasicisihk
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: kiwayasicisihk
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: owayasicisihk
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px4Sg+Loc: owayasicisiyihk
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: niwayasicisinâhk
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: kiwayasicisinâhk
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: kiwayasicisiwâhk
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: owayasicisiwâhk
     wayasit+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px4Pl+Loc: owayasicisiyihk
